Nebraska, session 109, LB1106.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1106 LB1106
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-7611, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-7611 (1) The Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund is created. The State
Treasurer shall transfer (a) sixty million three hundred thousand dollars
on or before July 15, 2014, (b) sixty million three hundred fifty
thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2015, (c) sixty million three
hundred fifty thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2016, (d) sixty
million seven hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2017, (e)
five hundred thousand dollars on or before May 15, 2018, (f) sixty-one
million six hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2018, (g)
sixty-two million dollars on or before July 15, 2019, (h) sixty-one
million four hundred fifty thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2020,
(i) sixty-six million two hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15,
2022, (j) fifty-six million seven hundred thousand dollars on or before
July 15, 2023, (k) fifty-four million dollars on or before July 15, 2024,
(l) fifty-nine million one hundred fifty thousand dollars on or before
July 1, 2025, and (m) sixty million one hundred fifty thousand dollars on
or before every July 15 thereafter from the Nebraska Medicaid
Intergovernmental Trust Fund and the Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust
Fund to the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund, except that such amount shall
be reduced by the amount of the unobligated balance in the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund at the time the transfer is made. The state
investment officer shall advise the State Treasurer on the amounts to be
transferred first from the Nebraska Medicaid Intergovernmental Trust Fund
until the fund balance is depleted and from the Nebraska Tobacco
Settlement Trust Fund thereafter in order to sustain such transfers in
perpetuity. The state investment officer shall report electronically to
the Legislature on or before October 1 of every even-numbered year on the
sustainability of such transfers. The Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund
shall also include money received pursuant to section 77-2602. Except as
otherwise provided by law, no more than the amounts specified in this
-2-

LB1106 LB1106
2026 2026
subsection may be appropriated or transferred from the Nebraska Health
Care Cash Fund in any fiscal year.
It Except as otherwise provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this
section, it is the intent of the Legislature that no additional programs
are funded through the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund until funding for
all programs with an appropriation from the fund during FY2012-13 are
restored to their FY2012-13 levels.
(2) Any money in the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(3) The University of Nebraska and postsecondary educational
institutions having colleges of medicine in Nebraska and their affiliated
research hospitals in Nebraska, as a condition of receiving any funds
appropriated or transferred from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund,
shall not discriminate against any person on the basis of sexual
orientation.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million dollars from
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2022, but before
June 30, 2023, to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska for
the University of Nebraska Medical Center for pancreatic cancer research
at the University of Nebraska Medical Center. Transfers from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund in this subsection shall be contingent upon receipt
of any matching funds from private or other sources, up to fifteen
million dollars, certified by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services. Upon receipt of
any matching funds certified by the budget administrator, the State
Treasurer shall transfer an equal amount of funds to the Board of Regents
of the University of Nebraska.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer three hundred thousand
dollars on or before July 15 of each fiscal year to the Patient Safety
-3-

LB1106 LB1106
2026 2026
Cash Fund.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-7611, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-